Hawaii statutes.
§383-107 Reimbursement payments deemed
benefits, when. Reimbursements paid from the fund pursuant to section
383-106(a)(3) shall be deemed to be benefits for the purpose of sections 383-21
to 383-24, 383-72, 383-76, and 383-121 to 383-124. The department of labor and
industrial relations may make to other state or federal agencies and receive
from such other state or federal agencies reimbursements from or to the fund,
in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to section 383-106. [L
1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 37; RL 1945, §4295; am L 1953, c 41, §1(1); RL
1955, §93-106; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-107; am L 1969, c 3, §2; am
L 1971, c 187, §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next